Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 354 Clay Mining [Repealed]

354.010.
Definitions — Mining governed by KRS 354.010 to 354.470. [Repealed.]

354.020.
Administration of KRS 354.010 to 354.470. [Repealed.]

354.030.
Hearings before department. [Repealed.]

354.040.
Action to vacate order of department — Appeal. [Repealed.]

354.050.
Duties of chief of department. [Repealed.]

354.060.
Board of Examiners for clay mine foremen. [Repealed.]

354.070.
Admission to examination — Fee. [Repealed.]

354.080.
Certificates, how granted, form and contents. [Repealed.]

354.090.
Duplicate certificate. [Repealed.]

354.100.
Duties of district mine inspectors. [Repealed.]

354.110.
Reports of chief — Duty to furnish copies of inspection reports. [Repealed.]

354.120.
Reports of owner, lessee or superintendent. [Repealed.]

354.130.
Inspection of mine scales; fee. [Repealed.]

354.140.
Methods of ventilation; amount of air required. [Repealed.]

354.150.
Men permitted to work in single air current or in place without proper ventilation. [Repealed.]

354.160.
Working places not to be driven in advance of air current. [Repealed.]

354.170.
Motive power and fuel used — Underground stables. [Repealed.]

354.180.
Checking employees in and out. [Repealed.]

354.190.
Abandoned parts of mine to be closed and posted. [Repealed.]

354.200.
Abandoned mine not to be entered — Exception. [Repealed]

354.210.
Mines to have two openings — Exception — Condemnation of land for opening. [Repealed.]

354.220.
Stairways or hoisting devices in shafts — Passageways to be unobstructed — Direction signs. [Repealed.]

354.230.
Hoisting devices in shafts, regulations concerning. [Repealed.]

354.240.
Drum runners and engineers — Operation of cages and cars. [Repealed.]

354.250.
Haulage roads — Regulations concerning. [Repealed.]

354.260.
First-aid equipment and training. [Repealed.]

354.270.
Safety of working place. [Repealed.]

354.280.
Conduct in mine — Intoxication prohibited. [Repealed.]

354.290.
Electricity in mines. [Repealed.]

354.300.
Explosives in mines. [Repealed.]

354.310.
Storage of oil or similar substance. [Repealed.]

354.320.
Mine foreman — Assistants. [Repealed.]

354.330.
General duties of mine foreman — Duty of operator. [Repealed.]

354.340.
Examination of mine by mine foreman — Removal of dangers — Record. [Repealed.]

354.350.
Mine foreman to notify operator or superintendent of dangers — Duties as to reports. [Repealed.]

354.360.
Mine foreman’s duties as to break-throughs — Measurement of air current — Signboards pointing to outlets and escape ways. [Repealed.]

354.370.
Boreholes in advance of face, when required. [Repealed.]

354.380.
Death or resignation of mine foreman. [Repealed.]

354.390.
Revocation of certificate of mine foreman. [Repealed.]

354.400.
Mine rules. [Repealed.]

354.410.
Duties of mine superintendent and operator. [Repealed.]

354.420.
Inspection and closing of mines by department — Review by court. [Repealed.]

354.430.
Appeal by miners from inspection by district inspector. [Repealed.]

354.440.
Map of mine to be filed annually — Additional maps. [Repealed.]

354.450.
Procedure when map not filed or map incorrect. [Repealed.]

354.460.
Certification of map. [Repealed.]

354.470.
Mining near oil or gas wells — Hearing. [Repealed.]

354.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]